New Mexico, session 2026, SB216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the public education department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to issue certificates pursuant to Section 22-10A-13 NMSA 1978 to persons proficient in a Native American language and culture of an Indian nation, tribe or pueblo located wholly or partially in New Mexico. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233414.1